California, session 20252026, AB1270.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 16005 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:16005. Siblings shall be assigned to the same social worker when there is a prospective adoptive family that intends to adopt the children as a sibling group, unless the responsible local agency finds that assigning the siblings to the same social worker would not be in the best interest of the child or the siblings child, the siblings, or the operation of the county office.